Utah statutes.
49-11-503.   Rate of interest on redeposits, adjustments, and delinquent payments.

The rate of interest charged on redeposits of refunds, adjustments, or delinquent payments is the greater of:

(1)  the interest rate as determined under a formula approved by the board; or

(2)  the actuarial interest rate as of the preceding June 30.

